Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2036.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1506(b)(2) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1506. Fund.* * *(b) Deposits to fund by department.--* * *(2) Upon receipt, the department shall deposit the amount made available to the department as an executive authorization and any appropriation for the 2007-2008 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter from the State Lottery Fund for fixed route transit and for the Free Transit Program for Senior Citizens established under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law. The 12345678910111213141516171819 funds deposited under this paragraph shall only be used as permitted by the State Lottery Law and section 1506.1 (relating to residency requirement for senior programs), except that:(i) funds may be used to pay estimated transit losses resulting from providing free service for senior passengers during the provider's regular hours of service; and(ii) fares for senior citizens on commuter rail service shall be limited to $1 per trip and shall be extended to all hours of commuter rail service.* * *Section 2. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1506.1. Residency requirement for senior programs.(a) Verification of residency.--The department may only make payments from amounts deposited into the fund under section 1506(b)(2) (relating to fund) for senior passengers who are senior citizens and have provided documentation approved by the department under subsection (b) demonstrating residency in this Commonwealth.(b) Approved documentation.--Subject to subsection (d), the department shall establish a list of acceptable documents demonstrating Commonwealth residency.(c) Periodic review.--In order to receive funds from amounts deposited into the fund under section 1506(b)(2), a transportation company, local transportation organization or county transportation system shall require a senior citizen to provide documentation required under subsection (a) not less than once every four years.(d) Department-issued identification.--A senior citizen who 20250HB2036PN2606 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provides a valid, unexpired driver's license or photo identification card issued by the department shall not be required to provide any other documentation to demonstrate Commonwealth residency.(e) Technical assistance.--The department shall provide technical assistance to transportation companies, local transportation organizations or county transportation systems in order to ensure compliance with this section, including authenticating the validity of documentation submitted under this section.(f) Compliance.--(1) A transportation company, local transportation organization or county transportation system shall be considered in compliance with this section and eligible to receive funds from amounts deposited into the fund under section 1506(b)(2) if all of the following requirements are met:(i) The transportation company, local transportation organization or county transportation system submits a plan approved by the department ensuring compliance with this section for senior citizens being approved for free or reduced fares after the effective date of this subparagraph.(ii) The transportation company, local transportation organization or county transportation system submits a plan approved by the department ensuring compliance with this section for senior citizens approved for free or reduced fares prior to the effective date of this subparagraph. The plan shall ensure compliance with this section for previously approved senior citizens 20250HB2036PN2606 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within 12 months of the effective date of this subparagraph.(2) A transportation company, local transportation organization or county transportation system that has submitted plans approved by the department under this subsection may not be required to submit individual records or documents of a senior citizen in order to receive funds unless requesting technical assistance regarding the approval of a senior citizen for free or reduced fares or when complying with paragraph (3).(3) The department shall conduct random, periodic audits of transportation companies, local transportation organizations and county transportation systems receiving funds from amounts deposited into the fund under section 1506(b)(2) to ensure compliance with this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB2036PN2606 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516